Idaho, session 2026, H0783.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3022K, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3022K. MEDICAL SAVINGS ACCOUNT. (1) For taxable years commencing
on and after January 1, 1995, annual contributions to a medical savings ac-
count not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the account holder and
interest earned on a medical savings account shall be deducted from taxable
income by the account holder, if such amount has not been previously deducted
or excluded in arriving at taxable income. For married individuals, the max-
imum deduction shall be computed separately for each individual. Contribu-
tions to the account shall not exceed the amount deductible under this sec-
tion.
(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, the an-
nual contributions to a medical savings account shall be limited to ten thou-
sand dollars ($10,000). Both interest earned and all contributions to med-
ical savings accounts shall be deducted from taxable income by the account
holder, if such amount has not been previously deducted or excluded in arriv-
ing at taxable income.
(3) For the purpose of this section, the following terms have the fol-
lowing meanings unless the context clearly denotes otherwise:
(a) "Account holder" means an individual, in the case of married indi-
viduals each spouse, including a self-employed person, on whose behalf
the medical savings account is established.
(b) "Dependent" means a person for whom a deduction is permitted under
section 151(b) or (c) of the Internal Revenue Code if a deduction for the
person is claimed for that person on the account holder's Idaho income
tax return.
(c) "Dependent child" means a child or grandchild of the account holder
who is not a dependent if the account holder actually pays the eligible
medical expenses of the child or grandchild and the child or grandchild
is any of the following:
(i) Under twenty-one (21) years of age, or enrolled as a full-time
student at an accredited college or university.;
(ii) Legally entitled to the provision of proper or necessary sub-
sistence, education, medical care or other care necessary for his
or her health, guidance or well-being and not otherwise emanci-
pated, self-supporting, married or a member of the armed forces of
the United States.; or


(iii) Mentally or physically incapacitated to the extent that he
or she is not self-sufficient.
(d) "Depository" means a state or national bank, savings and loan asso-
ciation, credit union or trust company authorized to act as a fiduciary
or an insurance administrator or insurance company authorized to do
business in this state, a broker or investment advisor regulated by the
department of finance, a broker or insurance agent regulated by the
department of insurance or a health maintenance organization, frater-
nal benefit society, hospital and professional service corporation as
defined in section 41-3403, Idaho Code, or nonprofit mutual insurer
regulated under title 41, Idaho Code.
(e) "Eligible medical expense" means an expense paid by the taxpayer
for medical care described in section 213(d) of the Internal Revenue
Code, and long-term care expenses of the account holder, or expenses
paid by the account holder as a member of a health care sharing ministry
as defined in section 41-121, Idaho Code, and the spouse, dependents and
dependent children of the account holder.
(f) "Long-term care expenses" means expenses incurred in providing
custodial care in a nursing facility as defined in section 39-1301,
Idaho Code, and for insurance premiums relating to long-term care in-
surance under chapter 46, title 41, Idaho Code.
(g) "Medical savings account" means an account established with a de-
pository to pay the eligible medical expenses of the account holder and
the dependents and dependent children of the account holder. Medical
savings accounts shall carry the name of the account holder, a desig-
nated beneficiary or beneficiaries of the account holder and shall be
designated by the depository as a "medical savings account."
(4) Upon agreement between an employer and employee, an employer may
establish and contribute to the employee's medical savings account or con-
tribute to an employee's existing medical savings account. For taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 1995, but before January 1, 2014, the
total combined annual contributions by an employer and the account holder
shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the account holder. Em-
ployer contributions to an employee's medical savings account shall be owned
by the employee.
(5) Funds held in a medical savings account may be withdrawn by the
account holder at any time. Withdrawals for the purpose of paying eligible
medical expenses shall not be subject to the tax imposed in this chapter.
Funds held in a medical savings account must be exhausted before the account
holder, the account holder's dependent or the account holder's dependent
child receives any state assistance for medical care. The burden of proving
that a withdrawal from a medical savings account was made for an eligible
medical expense is upon on the account holder and not upon on the depository
or the employer of the account holder. Other withdrawals shall be subject to
the following restrictions and penalties:
(a) There shall be a distribution penalty for withdrawal of funds by the
account holder for purposes other than the payment of eligible medical
expenses. The penalty shall be ten percent (10%) of the amount of with-
drawal from the account and, in addition, the amount withdrawn shall be
subject to the tax imposed in this chapter. The direct transfer of funds


from a medical savings account to a medical savings account at a differ-
ent depository shall not be considered a withdrawal for purposes of this
section. Charges relating to the administration and maintenance of the
account by the depository are not withdrawals for purposes of this sec-
tion.
(b) After an account holder reaches fifty-nine and one-half (59 1/2)
years of age, withdrawals may be made for eligible medical expenses or
for any other reason without penalty, but subject to the tax imposed by
this section.
(c) Upon the death of an account holder, the account principal, as
well as any interest accumulated thereon, shall be distributed without
penalty to the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries.
(d) Funds withdrawn which that are later reimbursed shall be taxable
unless redeposited into the account within sixty (60) days of the reim-
bursement. Deposits of reimbursed eligible medical expenses shall not
be included in calculating the amount deductible.
(e) Funds deposited in a medical savings account which that are de-
posited in error or unintentionally and which that are withdrawn within
thirty (30) days of being deposited shall be treated as if the amounts
had not been deposited in the medical savings account. Funds withdrawn
from a medical savings account which that are withdrawn in error or un-
intentionally and which that are redeposited within thirty (30) days
of being withdrawn shall be treated as if the amounts had not been with-
drawn from the medical savings account.
(f) Funds withdrawn which that are, not later than the sixtieth day af-
ter the day of the withdrawal, deposited into another medical savings
account for the benefit of the same account holder are not a withdrawal
for purposes of this section and shall not be included in calculating
the amount deductible.
(6) Reporting. Depositories, in the case of medical savings accounts,
shall provide to the state tax commission, in the routine fashion used for
all interest-bearing accounts, the same information that is provided for
any interest-bearing bank account. So as to minimize the burden of report-
ing, the information shall be provided in the format in which information is
provided for any interest-bearing bank account to the state tax commission.
There shall be no other reporting requirements. Account holders shall pro-
vide on any state income tax form in which they take a deduction for a medical
savings account the account number of their medical savings account and the
depository at which the account is held.
(7) Any medical care savings account established pursuant to chapter
53, title 41, Idaho Code, as enacted by chapter 186, laws of 1994, may be con-
tinued pursuant to the provisions of this section and all duties, privileges
and liabilities imposed in this section upon account holders of medical care
savings accounts and the beneficiaries of those accounts shall apply to ac-
count holders of medical care savings accounts and their beneficiaries es-
tablished pursuant to chapter 53, title 41, Idaho Code, as enacted by chapter
186, laws of 1994, as if the medical care savings account were a medical sav-
ings account established pursuant to this section.
(8)(a) If the account holder's surviving spouse acquires the account
holder's interest in a medical savings account by reason of being the


designated beneficiary of such account at the death of the account
holder, the medical savings account shall be treated as if the spouse
were the account holder.
(b) If, by reason of the death of the account holder, any person ac-
quires the account holder's interest in a medical savings account in a
case to which subsection (8)(a) of this section does not apply:
(i) Such account shall cease to be a medical savings account as of
the date of death; and
(ii) An amount equal to the fair market value of the assets in such
account on such date shall be includable, if such person is not the
estate of such holder, in such person's Idaho taxable income for
the taxable year which that includes such date, or if such person
is the estate of such holder, in such holder's Idaho taxable income
for the last taxable year of such holder.
(c) The amount includable in Idaho taxable income under subsection
(8)(b) of this section by any person, other than the estate, shall be
reduced by the amount of qualified medical expenses which that were in-
curred by the decedent before the date of the decedent's death and paid
by such person within one (1) year after such date.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2027.